Ohio, session 136, SB467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4549.13 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 4549.13. Any motor vehicle used by a member of the state highway patrol or by any other peace officer, while said officer is on duty for the exclusive or main purpose of enforcing the motor vehicle or traffic laws of this state, provided the offense is punishable as a misdemeanor or as a civil traffic law violation recorded by a traffic law photo-monitoring device, as defined in section 4511.092 of the Revised Code, shall be marked in some distinctive manner or color and that is equivalent to the other motor vehicles used by that jurisdiction for law enforcement purposes. The motor vehicle shall be equipped with, but need not necessarily have in operation at all times, at least one flashing, oscillating, or rotating colored light mounted outside on top of the vehicle. The superintendent of the state highway patrol shall specify what constitutes such a distinctive marking or color for the state highway patrol. Section 2. That existing section 4549.13 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.